Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6217
Registration,
defined.

Registration shall mean the formal notification
which, prior to rendering services, a practitioner submits to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner, the location, nature,
and operation of the health activity to be practiced, and such other information
which is required by the regulatory entity. A registered practitioner may
be subject to discipline and standards of professional conduct established
by the regulatory entity and may be
required to meet any test of education, experience, or training in order to
render services.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 17;

Laws 1988, LB 384, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 14.